Maine, session 132, LD505.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 18-C MRSA §1-108, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 390, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. "Reference base index" means:
(1) With respect to calculations made under this section subsection 2 relating to
dollar amounts stated in sections 2‑102, 2‑402, 2‑403, 2‑405 and 3‑1201, the
Consumer Price Index for calendar year 2017; and
(2) With respect to calculations made under this section subsection 2 relating to
the dollar amount stated in section 2‑807 for loss of comfort, society and
companionship, the Consumer Price Index for calendar year 2023.; and
(3) With respect to calculations made under subsection 3, the Consumer Price
Index for calendar year 2024.
Sec. 2. 18-C MRSA §1-108, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Automatic adjustment of filing fees. The filing fee dollar amounts stated in
sections 1-602, 1-701, 9-301 and 9-312 apply to the fees assessed when the petition or
motion referenced in those sections is filed with the court in 2025, but for petitions or
motions filed after 2025, these dollar amounts must be increased or decreased if the
Consumer Price Index for the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the
petition or motion was filed exceeds or is less than the reference base index. The amount
of any increase or decrease is computed by multiplying each dollar amount by the
percentage by which the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which the petition or motion was filed exceeds or is less than the
reference base index. If any increase or decrease produced by the computation is not a
multiple of $5, the increase or decrease is rounded down, if an increase, or up, if a decrease,
to the next multiple of $5. With respect to calculations made under this subsection, if the
Consumer Price Index for calendar year 2024 is changed by the United States Department
of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, the reference base index must be revised using the
rebasing factor reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics or other comparable data if a
rebasing factor is not reported.
Sec. 3. 18-C MRSA §1-112 is enacted to read:
§1-112. Use of artificial intelligence technology in documents filed with the court
1. Verification of court filing. A party that uses artificial intelligence technology to
create or to assist in creating any petition, motion or other document filed with the court
shall submit an affidavit verifying the accuracy of the portions of the petition, motion or
other document that were created using artificial intelligence technology.
2. Sanctions for noncompliance. If the court finds that a party failed to comply with
the requirements of this section, it may impose any sanction that is appropriate in the
circumstances.
Sec. 4. 18-C MRSA §1-602, as amended by PL 2021, c. 250, §1, is further amended
to read:
§1-602. Filing and certification fees
Page 1 - 132LR0934(01)

The Except as provided in subsection 15, the person making the request shall pay the
register the following fees for filing or certifying documents.
1. Certification. For making and certifying to the register of deeds copies of devises
of real estate, abstracts of petitions for appointment of a personal representative or for an
elective share and any other document for which certification is required, the fee is $20 $35
plus the fee for recording as provided by Title 33, section 751, except as otherwise
expressly provided by law. The fee must be paid by the personal representative, petitioner
or other person filing the document to be certified when the copy of the devise, abstract,
petition for elective share or other document for which certification is required is requested.
The register of probate shall deliver the certified document to the register of deeds together
with the fee for recording as provided by Title 33, section 751.
2. Filing. For receiving and entering each petition or application for all estates, testate
and intestate, including foreign estates, and the filing of a notice by a domiciliary foreign
personal representative, except for the filing of a successor personal representative, when
the value of the estate is:
A. $10,000 and under, the fee is $40 $50;
B. $10,001 to $20,000, the fee is $60 $70;
C. $20,001 to $30,000, the fee is $75 $90;
D. $30,001 to $40,000, the fee is $95 $110;
E. $40,001 to $50,000, the fee is $125 $145;
F. $50,001 to $75,000, the fee is $190 $220;
G. $75,001 to $100,000, the fee is $250 $290;
H. $100,001 to $150,000, the fee is $325 $375;
I. $150,001 to $200,000, the fee is $375 $435;
J. $200,001 to $250,000, the fee is $450 $530;
K. $250,001 to $300,000, the fee is $500 $580;
L. $300,001 to $400,000, the fee is $575 $670;
M. $400,001 to $500,000, the fee is $625 $725;
N. $500,001 to $750,000, the fee is $700 $810;
O. $750,001 to $1,000,000, the fee is $750 $870;
P. $1,000,001 to $1,500,000, the fee is $875 $1,015;
Q. $1,500,001 to $2,000,000, the fee is $950 $1,100; or
R. More than $2,000,000, the fee is $1,200 $1,400, and continuing in steps of $250
$300 for every increase in value of $500,000 or part thereof above $2,500,000.
For filing a will for no probate, the fee is $15 $20.
For filing a will to be probated and without an appointment, the fee is $20 $25.
3. Copies of court records. For making copies from the records of the court, the fee
is $1 for each page.
Page 2 - 132LR0934(01)

4. Certificate of appointment. For each certificate, under seal of the court, of the
appointment and qualification of a personal representative, guardian, conservator or trustee,
the fee is $10 $15, and for each double certificate, the fee is $20 $25.
5. Petition for appointment as guardian. For filing a petition for appointment as
guardian, the fee is $90 $105.
6. Application for involuntary hospitalization. For filing an application for
involuntary hospitalization, the fee is $10 $15.
7. Petition for guardian and conservator. For filing a joined petition for guardian
and conservator, the fee is $115 $135.
8. Petition for appointment of conservator. For filing a petition for appointment of
conservator, the fee is $90 $105.
9. Petition for elective share. For filing a petition for elective share, the fee is $120
$150.
10. Subsequent informal appointments. For all other subsequent informal
appointments, the fee is $50 $60.
11. Other formal proceeding. For filing any other formal proceeding, the fee is $50
$60.
12. Registration of guardianship order from another state or acceptance of
transfer. For registering a guardianship order from another state or acceptance of transfer,
the fee is $50 $65.
13. Petition to resolve a disputed claim and for allowance. For filing a petition to
resolve disputed claim and for allowance, the fee is $150.
14. Petition for order of complete settlement of estate. For filing a petition for an
order of complete settlement of estate, the fee is $150.
15. Discretionary fee; motion. For filing a motion, the court may charge a fee of not
more than $25.
Sec. 5. 18-C MRSA §1-607, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
1. Surcharge. In addition to any other fees required by law, a register shall collect a
surcharge of $10 $15 per petition, application or complaint, except for name changes, filed
in the court.
Sec. 6. 18-C MRSA §1-701, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 250, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Filing fee. The fee for filing a name change petition is $75 $90.
Sec. 7. 18-C MRSA §3-706, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
2. Inventory furnished on request. If the personal representative filed the inventory
with the court pursuant to subsection 1, the personal representative shall furnish the
inventory to interested persons who request it. If the personal representative mailed the
inventory to all interested persons who requested it pursuant to subsection 1, the personal
representative may shall also file the inventory with the court.
Page 3 - 132LR0934(01)

Sec. 8. 18-C MRSA §5-405, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Quasi-judicial immunity. A person appointed by the court as a visitor acts as the
court's agent and is entitled to quasi-judicial immunity for acts performed within the scope
of the duties of the visitor.
Sec. 9. 18-C MRSA §9-202, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by amending the first blocked paragraph
to read:
The parents or the surviving parent must execute the surrender and release or the consent
in the presence of the judge. The adoptee, if 14 12 years of age or older, must execute the
consent in the presence of the judge. The waiver of notice by the putative parent is
governed by section 9‑201, subsection 3.
Sec. 10. 18-C MRSA §9-301, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
Spouses or unmarried persons jointly or an unmarried person, whether resident or
nonresident of the State, may petition the court to adopt a person, regardless of age, and to
change that person's name. The fee for filing the petition is $65 $75 plus:
Sec. 11. 18-C MRSA §9-312, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and affected
by Pt. F, §1 and PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§9-312. Foreign adoptions
If an adoption in a foreign country has been finalized and the adopting parents are
seeking an adoption under the laws of this State to give recognition to the foreign adoption,
a court may enter a decree of adoption based solely upon a judgment of adoption in a
foreign country and may order a change of name if requested by the adopting parents. The
fee for filing the petition is $55 $70.